Tennessee statutes. Title 1 Code And Statutes
Chapter 2

Enactment of Code

1-2-101. Designation of code.

This compilation of the laws of the state is to be designated as the “Tennessee Code” and the annotated edition of the code provided for by chapter 1 of this title shall be designated as “Tennessee Code Annotated”. Citations to the Tennessee Code Annotated may incorporate the abbreviations “Tenn. Code Ann.” or “T.C.A.”

As used in acts and resolutions of the general assembly, “Tennessee Code”, “Tennessee Code Annotated”, “Tenn. Code Ann.” or “T.C.A.” shall, unless a contrary intention is manifest, be construed to refer to this enactment of the Tennessee Code, amendments and revisions of the Tennessee Code, and additions and supplements to the Tennessee Code.

Code 1858, § 40; Shan., § 57; Code 1932, § 1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-201; Acts 2008, ch. 637, § 1.

Cross-References. Definition of “Code,” § 1-3-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Common Law, § 2.

1-2-102. Preservation of enrolled draft.

The enrolled draft of the official Tennessee Code shall, upon the approval of this statute by the governor, be deposited in the office of the secretary of state, and shall be carefully preserved by that officer as the official code of this state, adopted and declared to be such.

Code 1932, § 27; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-202.

Code Commission Notes.

Chapter 6 of the Public Acts of 1955, which enacted the Tennessee Code Annotated, was approved by the governor on February 2, 1955.

1-2-103. Effective date of code.

All the provisions of the following titles, chapters and sections shall be in force on and after January 1, 1956.

Code 1932, § 26; C. Supp. 1950, § 26.1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-203.

1-2-104. Repeal of public and general laws — Conflict with 1955 Acts.

All public and general acts passed prior to the 1955 session of the general assembly, and all such acts the subjects of which are revised in this code, except those named in § 1-2-105, subject to the limitations and with the exceptions herein expressed, are repealed.

In case of any conflict between chapter 70 of the Public Acts of 1953 or the acts of the 1955 session of the general assembly and this code, the former shall be controlling, and this regardless of respective dates of passage or approval.

Code 1858, § 41; Shan., § 58; Code 1932, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 2.1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-204.

Cross-References. Effect of repeal, §§ 1-2-107 — 1-2-113, 1-3-101.

Laws not repealed, § 1-2-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Common Law, §§ 2, 7.

1-2-105. Laws not repealed.

The following are not to be deemed repealed by the enactment of this code, or the failure to incorporate the statutes or provisions of statutes as a part of this code, unless repealed by necessary implication:

Local, special or private acts, or general or public acts of a temporary nature. “Local act” means one applicable to one (1) or more, but not all, subdivisions or parts of the state;

Provisions in general laws excepting particular localities or subdivisions from their operation;

Acts amendatory of general laws excepting such localities or political subdivisions of the state specifically from their operation;

Acts ceding territory and jurisdiction to the general government;

Acts fixing state or county boundaries;

Acts establishing or regulating special and local courts;

Acts fixing the times of holding courts, or providing for judges or chancellors holding any such, by special act;

Acts, which are not incorporated in this code, establishing, aiding or regulating state or state-aided parks, reservations or memorials;

Acts appropriating money or authorizing the issuance of bonds, or providing sinking funds, for special purposes;

Acts authorizing the construction of public buildings or works;

Acts authorizing officials to convey or mortgage property of the state, including grants of easements;

Curative or validating acts, or provisions in acts, though relating to a general law;

Acts of incorporation passed before the Constitution of 1870 became effective;

Acts incorporating grand lodges of fraternal orders, or societies, and creating or regulating charitable bodies, such as the Ladies' Hermitage Association;

Acts relating to turnpikes and turnpike corporations;

Provisions in general acts saving rights accrued or status fixed under previous acts or laws;

Occupant, entry and other land laws; and

Any act to provide for the revenue of the state and the counties and municipalities thereof, except as may be incorporated in this code.

Code 1932, § 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-205.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Grand Jury, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure — 1959 Tennessee Survey, 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1131 (1959).

1-2-106. Special provisions preserved.

None of the provisions of §§ 4, 5, 6, 6a, 6b, or 16 of chapter 165 of the Public Acts of 1937, nor of the second paragraph of § 15 of that chapter, nor of chapter 11 of the Public Acts of the Second Extraordinary Session of 1931, nor of chapter 103 of the Public Acts of 1933, nor of §§ 1 to 18, inclusive, 20 to 33, inclusive, 35, or 37 to 41, inclusive, of chapter 70 of the Public Acts of 1953, nor of the first sentence of § 19 of that chapter, shall be deemed repealed by the enactment of this code, or the incorporation of or failure to incorporate these chapters or sections or any part thereof in this code, unless repealed by necessary implication.

C. Supp. 1950, § 3.1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-206.

Compiler's Notes. Sections 6a and 6b of Acts 1937, ch. 165, referred to in this section, were added by Acts 1939, ch. 188 and Acts 1945, ch. 155, respectively.

1-2-107. Effect on statutes of limitations.

Such repeal, as to any statute of limitations, under which the bar of a right of action or remedy is complete at the time the repeal takes effect, shall not be deemed a removal of such bar.

Code 1932, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-207.

Law Reviews.

Statute of Limitations, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 1046 (1954).

1-2-108. Effect on criminal offenses.

No offense committed, and no penalty or forfeiture incurred, under any act hereby repealed, and before January 1, 1956, shall be affected by the repeal; except that when a punishment, penalty, or forfeiture is mitigated by the provisions herein contained, such provisions may be applied to the judgment pronounced after December 31, 1955.

Code 1858, § 45; Shan., § 59a3; Code 1932, § 8; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-208.

1-2-109. Prosecutions for offenses and penalties.

No suit or prosecution, pending on January 1, 1956, for an offense committed, or for the recovery of a penalty or forfeiture incurred, shall be affected by the repeal, but the proceedings may be conformed to the provisions of this code as far as applicable.

Code 1858, § 46; Shan., § 59a4; Code 1932, § 9; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-209.

1-2-110. Continuation in effect of existing laws.

The existing acts continue in force until January 1, 1956.

Code 1858, § 43; Shan., § 59a1; Code 1932, § 4; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-210.

1-2-111. Actions commenced — Rights accrued.

No action or proceeding commenced before January 1, 1956, and no right accrued, is affected by the provisions of this code, but such proceedings may be conformed to the requirements of the code as far as applicable.

Code 1858, § 44; Shan., § 59a2; Code 1932, § 5; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-211.

1-2-112. Litigation pending on effective date.

Although a notice, recognizance, or process has been given, taken, or issued before January 1, 1956, it may, nevertheless, be taken or returnable to a day after such date, in like manner as if this code had been in effect before the notice, recognizance, or process was given, taken or issued. Nothing in this code shall operate to discontinue any cause or matter, civil or criminal, which shall be pending and undetermined in any court on December 31, 1955; but every such cause and matter shall be proceeded in, tried and determined in such court.

Code 1932, § 6; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-212.

1-2-113. Limitations applicable.

Causes of action accruing before January 1, 1956, shall not be affected by any different limitations provided in the code, but shall be subject to existing limitations. If the limitation is uncertain, the longest time prescribed for the commencement of an action in any form for such cause shall be allowed.

Code 1858, § 47; Shan., § 59a5; mod. Code 1932, § 10; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 1-213.

Law Reviews.

Procedure in Contesting Life Insurance Policies (Aubrey F. Folts), 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 780 (1939).

1-2-114. Reenactment of supplemental and replacement volume material into code.

Reenactment of the Acts of the 2020 Sessions of the General Assembly.

This compilation of laws together with the supplemental reenactments set out in subdivision (b)(1) shall be deemed amendatory.

This compilation shall be deemed a reenactment of the general acts of a permanent nature enacted at the 2020 regular and extraordinary sessions of the general assembly to the extent codified by the codification act. The sections so reenacted shall be construed as continuations of the previous laws so reenacted, and pending litigation, criminal prosecutions and statutes of limitations shall not be affected by such reenactments.

Each section of this reenactment bearing the same number as a section appearing in the Tennessee Code as enacted in 1955 or in supplemental reenactments of the code is deemed to be in substitution for such section. Statutory references in any title, chapter, or section of the Tennessee Code shall be deemed to be references to the applicable provisions of law, and any change or rearrangements in numbering, division, or placement of the actual title, chapter, or section referred to shall not affect the validity of such references. Where only a portion of a section appears in this reenactment, such portion is deemed to be either in substitution of the same portion appearing in the Tennessee Code or supplemental reenactment or an addition to such section. Where section numbers of the Tennessee Code or supplemental reenactments are followed by “Repealed” or “Superseded”, they are deemed repealed unless limiting or restricting language follows the word “Repealed” or “Superseded”, in which latter event such repeal or supersession shall be limited or restricted in accordance with such language. Where section numbers of the Tennessee Code or supplemental reenactments are followed by “Unconstitutional” or are noted as having been found unconstitutional, this is reflective of a definitive court decision on the constitutionality of that section. Clauses, preambles, captions, statements of legislative intent, severability or reverse-severability clauses omitted from codification pursuant to § 1-1-108, remain valid in construing legislative intent of the codified portions of the act notwithstanding that the omitted portions of the act were not codified.

All public acts of a general and permanent nature passed at the 2020 sessions of the general assembly, to the extent codified in the code, are repealed except those laws excepted by § 1-2-105 of the Tennessee Code.

The enrolled draft of this reenactment shall, upon approval of this statute by the governor, be deposited in the office of the secretary of state, and shall be carefully preserved by that officer as an official reenactment of supplemental material to the Tennessee Code.

All provisions of the Tennessee Code as enacted by chapter 6 of the Public Acts of 1955 and the supplemental reenactments set out in subdivision (b)(1) referring generally to such code, including the provisions of chapter 3 of this title, shall be likewise applicable to the sections of this reenactment and to prior supplemental reenactments.

In case of any conflict between the acts of the 2021 session of the general assembly, or any extraordinary session occurring after the 2020 regular session of the general assembly, and this reenactment, the former shall be controlling regardless of the respective dates of passage or approval.

All references and amendments in the acts of the 2021 session of the general assembly to code sections included in this reenactment shall be deemed to be references or amendments to provisions of law as stated in this reenactment.

Reenactment of the Acts of the 1955 Through 2020 Sessions of the General Assembly.

The supplemental material enacted by chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1959, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1961, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1963, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1965, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1967, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1969, chapter 354 of the Public Acts of 1970, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1971, chapter 441 of the Public Acts of 1972, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1973, chapter 414 of the Public Acts of 1974, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1975, chapter 382 of the Public Acts of 1976, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1977, chapter 496 of the Public Acts of 1978, chapters 1 and 145 of the Public Acts of 1979, chapter 444 of the Public Acts of 1980, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1981, chapter 543 of the Public Acts of 1982, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1983, chapter 483 of the Public Acts of 1984, chapter 2 of the Public Acts of 1985, chapters 523 and 786 of the Public Acts of 1986, chapter 4 of the Public Acts of 1987, chapter 458 of the Public Acts of 1988, chapter 5 of the Public Acts of 1989, chapter 668 of the Public Acts of 1990, chapter 28 of the Public Acts of 1991, chapter 528 of the Public Acts of 1992, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1993, chapter 543 of the Public Acts of 1994, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1995, chapter 554 of the Public Acts of 1996, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1997, chapter 574 of the Public Acts of 1998, chapter 235 of the Public Acts of 1999, chapter 574 of the Public Acts of 2000, chapter 52 of the Public Acts of 2001, chapter 491 of the Public Acts of 2002, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 2003, chapter 437 of the Public Acts of 2004, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 2005, chapter 507 of the Public Acts of 2006, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 2007, chapter 607 of the Public Acts of 2008, chapter 2 of the Public Acts of 2009, chapter 624 of the Public Acts of 2010, chapter 41 of the Public Acts of 2011, chapter 582 of the Public Acts of 2012, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 2013, chapter 530 of the Public Acts of 2014, chapter 27 of the Public Acts of 2015, chapter 569 of the Public Acts of 2016, chapter 30 of the Public Acts of 2017, chapter 536 of the Public Acts of 2018, chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 2019 and chapter 518 of the Public Acts of 2020 shall be deemed amendatory of, supplemental to and become part of the Tennessee Code enacted as chapter 6 of the Public Acts of 1955.

The supplemental material reenacted by chapters 450 and 802 of the Public Acts of 1980, by chapters 5 through 13 of the Public Acts of 1981, by chapters 2, 3, 6, and 7 of the Public Acts of 1983, by chapters 487 and 488 of the Public Acts of 1984, by chapters 4 through 6 of the Public Acts of 1985, by chapters 1 through 3 of the Public Acts of 2006, and chapters 1 through 4 of the Public Acts of 2010 shall be deemed amendatory of, supplemental to and become part of the Tennessee Code enacted as chapter 6 of the Public Acts of 1955.

The material contained in replacement volumes 9A (1983 edition), 12A (1983 edition), 6 (1984 edition), 2 (1985 edition), 2A (1985 edition), 2B (1985 edition), 11 (1986 edition), 3A (1987 edition), 12A (1987 edition), 12B (1987 edition), 8 (1987 edition), 8B (1988 edition), 3 (1988 edition), 10 (1988 edition), 10A (1989 edition), 10B (1989 edition), 12 (1989 edition), 9 (1990 edition), 10C (1990 edition), 11 (1990 edition), 7A (1990 edition), 6A (1991 edition), 7 (1991 edition), 2A (1991 edition), 9A (1991 edition), 12A (1992 edition), 3A (1992 edition), 2B (1992 edition), 8A (1992 edition), 11A (1993 edition), 10 (1993 edition), 3 (1993 edition), 8 (1993 edition), 4 (1994 edition), 10A (1994 edition), 2 (1994 edition), 12 (1994 edition), 8B (1995 edition), 12B (1995 edition), 6A (1996 edition), 8A (1996 edition), 9 (1996 edition), 12A (1996 edition), 7 (1997 edition), 7A (1997 edition), 10C (1997 edition), 11 (1997 edition), 2A (1998 edition), 2B (1998 edition), 10 (1998 edition), 12 (1998 edition), 3A (1999 edition), 3B (1999 edition), 9A (1999 edition), 4A (2000 edition), 5 (2000 edition), 8 (2000 edition), 10A (2000 edition), 6 (2001 edition), 6A (2001 edition), 8A (2001 edition), 8B (2001 edition), 12A (2001 edition), 3 (2002 edition), 8C (2002 edition), 9 (2002 edition), 10B (2002 edition), 2 (2003 edition), 7 (2003 edition), 7A (2003 edition), 12 (2003 edition), 10 (2004 edition), 11 (2004 edition), 11A (2004 edition), 12B (2004 edition), 2A (2005 edition), 2B (2005 edition), 6A (2005 edition) 9A (2005 edition), 7 (2006 edition), 7A (2006 edition), 7B (2006 edition), 12 (2006 edition), 12A (2006 edition), 1 (2007 edition), 1A (2007 edition), 6 (2007 edition), 8 (2007 edition), 8A (2007 edition), 9A (2008 edition), 9B (2008 edition), 9C (2008 edition), 10 (2008 edition), 10A (2008 edition), 4 (2009 edition), 9 (2009 edition), 10C (2009 edition), 13 (2009 edition), 6A (2010 edition), 7 (2010 edition), 7B (2010 edition), 11 (2010 edition), 2A (2011 edition) 2B (2011 edition), 3 (2011 edition), 3B (2011 edition), 12 (2011 edition), 12A (2011 edition), 3A (2012 edition), 5 (2012 edition), 7A (2012 edition), 8D (2012 edition), 9C (2012 edition), 12B (2012 edition), 8C (2013 edition), 9 (2013 edition), 10B (2013 edition), 11B (2013 edition), 11C (2013 edition), 12 (2013 edition) 12A (2013 edition), 2 (2014 edition), 6A (2014 edition), 6B (2014 edition), 7 (2014 edition), 7B (2014 edition), 9A (2014 edition), 2A (2015 edition), 2B (2015 edition), 2C (2015 edition), 6 (2015 edition), 11A (2015 edition), 3 (2016 edition), 9 (2016 edition), 9A (2016 edition), 10 (2016 edition), 10A (2016 edition), 1A (2017 edition), 4A (2017 edition), 6A (2017 edition), 9D (2017 edition), 11 (2017 edition), 7 (2018 edition), 7A (2018 edition), 7B (2018 edition), 10B (2018 edition), 11C (2018 edition), 3B (2019 edition), 7C (2019 edition), 8D (2019 edition), 10C (2019 edition), 12B (2019 edition), 3A (2020 edition), 8A (2020 edition), 9 (2020 edition), 9A (2020 edition), and 9D (2020 edition), shall be deemed amendatory of, supplemental to and become part of the Tennessee Code enacted as chapter 6 of the Public Acts of 1955, as though such material were specifically reenacted in its entirety.

The supplemental reenactments set out in subdivision (b)(1) shall be deemed reenactments of the general acts of a permanent nature enacted at the sessions of the general assembly held in the years 1955 through 2020 which were codified therein. The sections so reenacted shall be construed as continuations of the previous laws so reenacted, and pending litigation, criminal prosecutions and statutes of limitations shall not be affected by such reenactments.

Each section of the supplemental reenactments bearing the same number as a section appearing in the Tennessee Code as enacted in 1955 or in prior supplemental reenactments of the code is deemed to be in substitution for such section. Where only a portion of a section appears, such portion is deemed to be either in substitution of the same portion appearing in the Tennessee Code or prior supplemental reenactments or an addition to such section. Where section numbers of the Tennessee Code or supplemental reenactments are followed by “Repealed” or “Superseded”, they are deemed repealed unless limiting or restricting language follows the word “Repealed” or “Superseded”, in which latter event such repeal or supersession shall be limited or restricted in accordance with such language. Where section numbers of the Tennessee Code or supplemental reenactments are followed by “Unconstitutional” or are noted as having been found unconstitutional, this is reflective of a definitive court decision on the constitutionality of that section. Clauses, preambles, captions, statements of legislative intent, severability or reverse-severability clauses omitted from codification pursuant to § 1-1-108, remain valid in construing legislative intent of the codified portions of the act notwithstanding that the omitted portions of the act were not codified.

All public acts of a general and permanent nature, to the extent codified in this act and the supplemental reenactments set out in subdivision (b)(1), which were passed prior to the 2020 session of the general assembly and after the 1953 session are repealed, except chapters 6 and 121 of the Public Acts of 1955, all of the supplemental reenactments set out in subdivision (b)(1), and those laws excepted by § 1-2-105 of the Tennessee Code.

The enrolled draft of each supplemental reenactment shall, upon approval of the statute by the governor, be deposited in the office of the secretary of state, and shall be carefully preserved by that officer as an official enactment of supplemental material to the Tennessee Code.

Title 47 of the Tennessee Code as enacted by chapter 6 of the Public Acts of 1955, as amended and supplemented by chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1961 and chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1963, is repealed in its entirety except as provided in § 47-1-110 [repealed]; provided, that the sections appearing in title 47, chapters 11-15 in the reenactment by chapter 1 of the Public Acts of 1965 shall be construed as continuations of the similar sections appearing in the former title 47, and pending litigation, criminal prosecutions and statutes of limitation shall not be affected by such repeal and reenactment.

In case any act or portion of an act codified and reenacted as provided in subdivision (b)(1) is thereafter deleted from this code for reasons other than repeal, supersession, or unconstitutionality, the original act or portion of an act so removed from the code shall be revived and continued in the same force and effect it had as a separate act prior to codification, notwithstanding any action occurring under subsection (a).

Legislative intent or effect which is dependent on the proposed placement of an act in the Tennessee Code shall not be affected by the actual codification of such material, and the general repealer contained in subdivision (a)(4) shall not affect such presumed intent.

T.C.A., § 1-214; Acts 1980, ch. 444, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 1, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 543, § 1; 1983, ch. 1, § 1; 1984, ch. 483, § 1; 1985, ch. 2, § 1; 1986, ch. 523, § 1; 1986, ch. 786, § 1; 1987, ch. 4, § 1; 1988, ch. 458, § 1; 1989, ch. 5, § 1; 1990, ch. 668, § 1; 1991, ch. 28, § 1; 1992, ch. 528, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 1994, ch. 543, § 1; 1995, ch. 1, § 1; 1996, ch. 554, § 1; 1997, ch. 1, § 1; 1998, ch. 574, § 1; 1999, ch. 235, § 1; 2000, ch. 574, § 1; 2001, ch. 52, § 1; 2002, ch. 491, § 1; 2003, ch. 1, § 1; 2004, ch. 437, § 1; 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2006, ch. 507, § 1; 2007, ch. 1, § 1; 2008, ch. 607, § 1; 2009, ch. 2, § 1; 2010, ch. 624, § 1; 2011, ch. 41, § 1; 2012, ch. 582, § 1; 2013, ch. 1, § 1; 2014, ch. 530, § 1; 2015, ch. 27, § 1; 2016, ch. 569, § 1; 2017, ch. 30, § 1; 2018, ch. 536, § 1; 2019, ch. 1, § 1; 2020, ch. 518, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section was amended by Acts 1995, ch. 1, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 1994 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 1996, ch. 554, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 1995 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 1997, ch. 1, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 1996 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 1998, ch. 574, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 1997 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 1999, ch. 235, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 1998 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2000, ch. 534, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 1999 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2001, ch. 52, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2000 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2002, ch. 491, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2001 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2003, ch. 1, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2002 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2004, ch. 437, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2003 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2005, ch. 1, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2004 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2006, ch. 507, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2005 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2007, ch. 1, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2006 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2008, ch. 607, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2007 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2009, ch. 2, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2008 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2010, ch. 624, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2009 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2011, ch. 41, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2010 regular and extraordinary legislative sessions.

This section was amended by Acts 2012, ch. 582, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2011 regular and extraordinary legislative sessions.

This section was amended by Acts 2013, ch. 1, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2012 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2014, ch. 530, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2013 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2015, ch. 27, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2014 regular legislative session.

This section was amended by Acts 2016, ch. 569, which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2015 regular legislative session.

Former § 47-1-110 referred to in subdivision (b)(6) was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 930, § 1, effective July 1, 2008, which enacted a revised chapter 1 to Title 47. The former section pertained to the continued validity of transactions entered into prior to midnight on June 30, 1964, when Acts 1963, ch. 81 became effective.

This section was amended by Acts 2017, ch. 30 which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2016 regular and extraordinary legislative sessions.

This section was amended by Acts 2018, ch. 536 which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2017 regular session.

This section was amended by Acts 2019, ch. 1 which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2018 regular session.

This section was amended by Acts 2020, ch. 518 which reenacted as part of the Tennessee Code those public laws enacted by the 2019 regular session.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 530, § 2. February 19, 2014.

Acts 2015, ch. 27, § 2. March 27, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 569, § 2. March 2, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 30, § 2. March 29, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 536, § 2. March 7, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 1, § 2. February 20, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 518, § 2. March 6, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. Effect of 1998 Codification Act on prior 1998 acts that amend provisions of the T.C.A. codified by the 1998 Codification Act, OAG 98-015 (1/12/98).